Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-875
Student teacher or intern, defined.

For purposes of sections 79-875 to 79-878, student teacher or intern means a student who is enrolled in a postsecondary educational institution approved by the State Board of Education for teacher training and who is jointly assigned by such institution and a board of education to student-teach or intern under the direction of a regularly employed certificated teacher, principal, or other administrator. Student teaching may include duties granted to a certificated teacher under the rules and regulations of such board and any other part of the school program for which either the cooperating teacher or the principal is responsible.

Laws 1971, LB 175, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1297;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 500.